Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB142.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 157.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In determining the cost of the program to support education excellence in
Kentucky, the statewide guaranteed base funding level, as defined in KRS
157.320, shall be computed by dividing the amount appropriated for this
purpose by the prior year's statewide average daily attendance.
(b) When determining the biennial appropriations for the program, the average
daily attendance for each fiscal year shall include an estimate of the number
of students graduating early under the provisions of KRS 158.142.
(2) Each district shall receive an amount equal to the base funding level for each pupil
in average daily attendance in the district in the previous year, except a district shall
receive an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion of the average
statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student who graduated
early under the provisions of KRS 158.142. Each district's base funding level shall
be adjusted by the following factors:
(a) The number of at-risk students in the district. At-risk students shall be
identified as those approved for the free lunch program under state and federal
guidelines. The number of at-risk students shall be multiplied by a factor to be
established by the General Assembly. Funds generated under this paragraph
may be used to pay for:
1. Alternative programs for students who are at risk of dropping out of
school before achieving a diploma; and
2. A hazardous duty pay supplement as determined by the local board of
education to the teachers who work in alternative programs with
students who are violent or assaultive;
(b) The number and types of exceptional children in the district as defined by
Page 1 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
KRS 157.200. Specific weights for each category of exceptionality shall be
used in the calculation of the add-on factor for exceptional children;[ and]
(c) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the number of children
identified as English language learners in the district. The number of
English language learners shall be multiplied by a factor of twenty-four
one-hundredths (0.24); and
(d) Transportation costs. The per-pupil cost of transportation shall be calculated
as provided by KRS 157.370. Districts which contract to furnish
transportation to students attending nonpublic schools may adopt any payment
formula which ensures that no public school funds are used for the
transportation of nonpublic students.
(3) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year and each year thereafter, the General
Assembly shall annually allocate funds equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion
of the average statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student
who graduated early under the provisions of KRS 158.142 the previous school year
to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority for deposit in the early
graduation scholarship trust fund.
(4) The program to support education excellence in Kentucky shall be fully
implemented by the 1994-95 school year.
(5) (a) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision
making, the commissioner of education shall enforce maximum class sizes for
every academic course requirement in all grades except in vocal and
instrumental music, and physical education classes. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, the maximum number of pupils enrolled in a
class shall be as follows:
1. Twenty-four (24) in primary grades (kindergarten through third grade);
2. Twenty-eight (28) in grade four (4);
Page 2 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
3. Twenty-nine (29) in grades five (5) and six (6);
4. Thirty-one (31) in grades seven (7) to twelve (12).
(b) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision
making, class size loads for middle and secondary school classroom teachers
shall not exceed the equivalent of one hundred fifty (150) pupil hours per day.
(c) The commissioner of education, upon approval of the Kentucky Board of
Education, shall adopt administrative regulations for enforcing this provision.
These administrative regulations shall include procedures for a superintendent
to request an exemption from the Kentucky Board of Education when unusual
circumstances warrant an increased class size for an individual class. A
request for an exemption shall include specific reasons for the increased class
size with a plan for reducing the class size prior to the beginning of the next
school year. A district shall not receive in any one (1) year exemptions for
more classes than enroll twenty percent (20%) of the pupils in the primary
grades and grades four (4) through eight (8).
(d) In all schools the commissioner of education shall enforce the special
education maximum class sizes set by administrative regulations adopted by
the Kentucky Board of Education. A superintendent may request an
exemption pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection. A local school council
may request a waiver pursuant to KRS 156.160(2). An exemption or waiver
shall not be granted if the increased class size will impede any exceptional
child from achieving his or her individual education program in the least
restrictive environment.
(6) In grades four (4) through six (6) with combined grades, the maximum class size
shall be the average daily attendance upon which funding is appropriated for the
lowest assigned grade in the class. There shall be no exceptions to the maximum
class size for combined classes. In combined classes other than the primary grades,
Page 3 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
no ungraded students shall be placed in a combined class with graded students. In
addition, there shall be no more than two (2) consecutive grade levels combined in
any one (1) class in grades four (4) through six (6). However, this shall not apply to
schools which have implemented school-based decision making.
(7) If a local school district, through its admission and release committee, determines
that an appropriate program in the least restrictive environment for a particular child
with a disability includes either part-time or full-time enrollment with a private
school or agency within the state or a public or private agency in another state, the
school district shall count as average daily attendance in a public school the time
that the child is in attendance at the school or agency, contingent upon approval by
the commissioner of education.
(8) Pupils attending a center for child learning and study established under an
agreement pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 shall, for the purpose of calculating
average daily attendance, be considered as in attendance in the school district in
which the child legally resides and which is party to the agreement. For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, teachers who are actually employees of the joint or
cooperative action shall be considered as employees of each school district which is
a party to the agreement.
(9) Program funding shall be increased when the average daily attendance in any
district for the first two (2) months of the current school year is greater than the
average daily attendance of the district for the first two (2) months of the previous
school year. The program funds allotted the district shall be increased by the
percent of increase. The average daily attendance in kindergarten is the
kindergarten full-time equivalent pupils in average daily attendance.
(10) If the average daily attendance for the current school year in any district decreases
by ten percent (10%) or more than the average daily attendance for the previous
school year, the average daily attendance for purposes of calculating program
Page 4 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
funding for the next school year shall be increased by an amount equal to two-thirds
(2/3) of the decrease in average daily attendance. If the average daily attendance
remains the same or decreases in the succeeding school year, the average daily
attendance for purposes of calculating program funding for the following school
year shall be increased by an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the decrease for the
first year of the decline.
(11) If the percentage of attendance of any school district shall have been reduced more
than two percent (2%) during the previous school year, the program funding
allotted the district for the current school year shall be increased by the difference in
the percentage of attendance for the two (2) years immediately prior to the current
school year less two percent (2%).
(12) (a) Instructional salaries for vocational agriculture classes shall be for twelve (12)
months per year. Vocational agriculture teachers shall be responsible for the
following program of instruction during the time period beyond the regular
school term established by the local board of education: supervision and
instruction of students in agriculture experience programs; group and
individual instruction of farmers and agribusinessmen; supervision of student
members of agricultural organizations who are involved in leadership training
or other activity required by state or federal law; or any program of vocational
agriculture established by the Department of Education. During extended
employment, no vocational agriculture teacher shall receive salary on a day
that the teacher is scheduled to attend an institution of higher education class
which could be credited toward meeting any certification requirement.
(b) Each teacher of agriculture employed shall submit an annual plan for summer
program to the local school superintendent for approval. The summer plan
shall include a list of tasks to be performed, purposes for each task, and time
to be spent on each task. Approval by the local school superintendent shall be
Page 5 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
in compliance with the guidelines developed by the Department of Education.
The supervision and accountability of teachers of vocational agriculture's
summer programs shall be the responsibility of the local school
superintendent. The local school superintendent shall submit to the
commissioner of education a completed report of summer tasks for each
vocational agriculture teacher. Twenty percent (20%) of the approved
vocational agriculture programs shall be audited annually by the State
Department of Education to determine that the summer plan has been properly
executed.
(13) (a) In allotting program funds for home and hospital instruction, statewide
guaranteed base funding, excluding the capital outlay, shall be allotted for
each child in average daily attendance in the prior school year who has been
properly identified according to Kentucky Board of Education administrative
regulations. Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall
be reported monthly on forms provided by the Department of Education; and
(b) Pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education,
local school districts shall be reimbursed for home and hospital instruction for
pupils unable to attend regular school sessions because of short-term health
impairments. A reimbursement formula shall be established by administrative
regulations to include such factors as a reasonable per hour, per child
allotment for teacher instructional time, with a maximum number of funded
hours per week, a reasonable allotment for teaching supplies and equipment,
and a reasonable allotment for travel expenses to and from instructional
assignments, but the formula shall not include an allotment for capital outlay.
Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall be reported
annually on forms provided by the Department of Education.
(14) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision making
Page 6 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
and the school council has voted to waive this subsection, kindergarten aides shall
be provided for each twenty-four (24) full-time equivalent kindergarten students
enrolled.
(15) Effective July 1, 2001, there shall be no deduction applied against the base funding
level for any pupil in average daily attendance who spends a portion of his or her
school day in a program at a state-operated career and technical education or
vocational facility.
(16) During a fiscal year, a school district may request that the Department of Education
recalculate its funds allocated under this section if the current year average daily
attendance for the twenty (20) day school month as defined in KRS 158.060(1) that
contains the most days within the calendar month of January exceeds the prior year
adjusted average daily attendance plus growth by at least one percent (1%). Any
adjustments in the allotments approved under this subsection shall be proportional
to the remaining days in the school year and subject to available funds under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
(17) To calculate the state portion of the program to support education excellence in
Kentucky for a school district, the Department of Education shall subtract the local
effort required under KRS 157.390(5) from the calculated base funding under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky, as required by this section.
The value of the real estate used in this calculation shall be the lesser of the current
year assessment or the prior year assessment increased by four percent (4%) plus
the value of current year new property. The calculation under this subsection shall
be subject to available funds.
(18) Notwithstanding any other statute or budget of the Commonwealth language to the
contrary, time missed due to shortening days for emergencies may be made up by
lengthening school days in the school calendar without any loss of funds under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
Page 7 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
Section 2. KRS 160.1596 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For purposes of this section, a member of the board of directors of a public
charter school shall be considered an officer under KRS 61.040 and shall,
within sixty (60) days of final approval of an application, take an oath of
office as required under KRS 62.010.
(b) Within seventy-five (75) days of the final approval of an application, the
board of directors and the authorizer shall enter into a binding charter contract
that establishes the academic and operational performance expectations and
measures by which the public charter school will be evaluated.
(c) The executed charter contract shall become the final authorization for the
public charter school. The charter contract shall include:
1. The term of the contract;
2. The agreements relating to each item required under KRS 160.1592(3)
and 160.1593(3), as modified or supplemented during the approval
process;
3. The rights and duties of each party;
4. The administrative relationship between the authorizer and the public
charter school;
5. The allocation of state, local, and federal funds, and the schedule to
disburse funds to the public charter school by the authorizer;
6. The process the authorizer will use to provide ongoing oversight,
including a process to conduct annual site visits;
7. The specific commitments of the public charter school authorizer
relating to its obligations to oversee, monitor the progress of, and
supervise the public charter school;
8. The process and criteria the authorizer will use to annually monitor and
evaluate the overall academic, operating, and fiscal conditions of the
Page 8 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
public charter school, including the process the authorizer will use to
oversee the correction of any deficiencies found in the annual review;
9. The process for revision or amendment to the terms of the charter
contract agreed to by the authorizer and the board of directors of the
public charter school;
10. The process agreed to by the authorizer and the board of directors of the
public charter school that identifies how disputes between the authorizer
and the board will be handled; and
11. Any other terms and conditions agreed to by the authorizer and the
board of directors, including pre-opening conditions. Reasonable
conditions shall not include enrollment caps or operational requirements
that place undue constraints on a public charter school or are
contradictory to the provisions of KRS 160.1590 to 160.1599 and
161.141. Such conditions, even when incorporated in a charter contract,
shall be considered unilaterally imposed conditions.
(d) 1. The performance provisions within a charter contract shall be based on a
performance framework that sets forth the academic and operational
performance indicators, measures, and metrics to be used by the
authorizer to evaluate each public charter school. The performance
framework shall include at a minimum indicators, measures, and metrics
for:
a. Student academic proficiency;
b. Student academic growth;
c. Achievement gaps in both student proficiency and student growth
for student subgroups, including race, sex, socioeconomic status,
and areas of exceptionality;
d. Student attendance;
Page 9 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
e. Student suspensions;
f. Student withdrawals;
g. Student exits;
h. Recurrent enrollment from year to year;
i. College or career readiness at the end of grade twelve (12);
j. Financial performance and sustainability; and
k. Board of directors' performance and stewardship, including
compliance with all applicable statutes, administrative regulations,
and terms of the charter contract.
2. The performance framework shall allow the inclusion of additional
rigorous, valid, and reliable indicators proposed by a public charter
school to augment external evaluations of its performance. The proposed
indicators shall be consistent with the purposes of KRS 160.1590 to
160.1599 and 161.141 and shall be negotiated with the authorizer.
3. The performance framework shall require the disaggregation of student
performance data by subgroups, including race, sex, socioeconomic
status, and areas of exceptionality.
4. The authorizer shall be responsible for collecting, analyzing, and
reporting to the state board all state-required assessment and
achievement data for each public charter school it oversees.
(e) Annual student achievement performance targets shall be set, in accordance
with the state accountability system, by each public charter school in
conjunction with its authorizer, and those measures shall be designed to help
each school meet applicable federal, state, and authorizer goals.
(f) The charter contract shall be signed by the chair of the governing board of the
authorizer and the chair of the board of directors of the public charter school.
An approved charter application shall serve as a charter contract for the public
Page 10 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
charter school.
(g) No public charter school may commence operations without a charter contract
executed according to this section and approved in an open meeting of the
governing board of the authorizer.
(2) Within five (5) days after entering into a charter contract, a copy of the executed
contract shall be submitted by the authorizer to the commissioner of education.
(3) For the purposes of local and state funding, a public charter school shall serve as a
school of the district of location.
(4) For the purposes of federal funding, a public charter school shall serve as a local
education agency.
(5) All students enrolled in a public charter school shall be included in the average
daily attendance calculation under KRS 157.360 and the aggregate and average
daily attendance of transported pupils calculation under KRS 157.370 of the district
of location in the same manner as any other public schools in the district and shall
be reported by the public charter schools to the school district and state Department
of Education for purposes of calculating the state and local share of funding for
each public charter school.
(6) Notwithstanding the formula for allocating district funds under KRS 160.345(8)
and any other statute governing a district's funding of schools, unless an authorizing
district agrees to provide a larger sum of funding in the charter contract, after local
capital outlay funds that are restricted in use pursuant to KRS 157.420(4) and funds
under KRS 157.440(1)(b) and 157.621 necessary to meet debt service obligations
on bonds or other financing mechanisms for new construction and renovation
projects for school facilities are excluded, and before any other funds are budgeted
for district use, a district shall transfer to each of the public charter schools located
within the district:
(a) The amount that is proportional to the public charter school's enrollment or
Page 11 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
average daily attendance in comparison with the overall district qualifying
numbers for:
1. Funds that are related to students' attendance and enrollment and
allocated to the district of location pursuant to KRS 157.360;
2. Any add-on or funding factors provided for in the state budget;
3. Any add-on or funding factors provided for by the Kentucky
Department of Education; and
4. Funds pursuant to KRS 157.360(2)(a) and (b) and (13)(a).
For each funding source identified in this paragraph, the transfer amount shall
be based on the public charter school's qualifying student enrollment or
average daily attendance, depending on the method used in the funding
source's calculation;
(b) On a proportionate per pupil basis:
1. Education funds allocated to the school district pursuant to KRS
157.440(1)(a) and (2)(a), or pursuant to any applicable federal statute;
and
2. All taxes and payments in lieu of taxes transferred to the district of
location or levied and collected by the district of location; and
(c) On a proportionate per pupil transported basis, transportation funds calculated
pursuant to KRS 157.360(2)(d)[(c)] and 157.370 and distributed to the district
of location, unless the school district provides transportation to students
attending the public charter school under written terms agreed upon by the
district and the public charter school in either the charter contract or, if the
district is not the public charter school's authorizer, a separate agreement.
(7) (a) If transportation funds are transferred under this section to a public charter
school, then the public charter school receiving those funds shall provide
transportation services to the enrolled students residing within the district of
Page 12 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
location.
(b) If funds designated for providing additional services to specific students are
transferred under this section, then the public charter school receiving those
funds shall provide those services in the same manner as the district of
location.
(c) If transportation services are not provided by the public charter school and no
written agreement to provide transportation services with the district of
location exists, then no transportation funds shall be transferred and the
district of location shall not be responsible for providing transportation to the
public charter school's students.
(8) Notwithstanding the identification of funds to be transferred in this section, a
collaborative among local school boards authorizing a public charter school may
negotiate among the local boards and a charter applicant to identify the amount of
funds to be transferred to the public charter school. The agreement shall be detailed
in the charter contract.
(9) (a) For the calculation of amounts under subsections (6) and (7) of this section
during the first school year of operation of a public charter school in a school
district, beginning with the start of instruction:
1. The public charter school's average daily attendance shall be calculated
based on a projection of the public charter school's enrollment and the
district's overall average daily attendance;
2. The public charter school's aggregate daily attendance of students
transported shall be calculated based on a projection of the public
charter school's enrollment and transportation plan and the district's
overall aggregate daily attendance of students transported; and
3. The amounts attributable to each individual student's attendance at the
public charter school shall be calculated based on a projection of the
Page 13 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
public charter school's enrollment and demographics and the district's
overall enrollment and demographics.
(b) The calculations shall be adjusted in January of the first school year of
operation to reflect the first semester's actual data. Subsequent years of
operation shall be calculated using actual data from the prior school year.
(10) (a) Funds identified for transfer under this section shall be transferred by a district
of location to each of the public charter schools located within the district.
However, up to three percent (3%) of the funds identified under this section
for transfer to a public charter school may be retained by an authorizer as an
authorizer fee.
(b) If the authorizer of a public charter school does not include the local board of
education of the district of location, then the district of location shall transfer
the authorizer fee to the public charter school's authorizer.
(c) If the Kentucky Board of Education requires the authorization of a public
charter school on appeal from an authorizer, the board shall receive twenty-
five percent (25%) of the authorizing fee for the duration of joint oversight
required by KRS 160.1595.
(11) Funds identified for transfer by a district of location to a public charter school under
this section shall be transferred throughout the school year according to a schedule
determined by the state board. The scheduled dates shall be within thirty (30) days
of the dates of state disbursement of funds to school districts. Failure to transfer
required funds shall, for every five (5) days late, result in a fine to the violator of
not less than five percent (5%) of the total funds per funding period to be
transferred. Fines imposed shall be transferred to the public charter school affected
by the delay.
(12) A public charter school shall be eligible for federal and state competitive grants and
shall not be excluded from an opportunity to apply or participate so long as the
Page 14 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
public charter school meets the criteria established for the respective grants. Each
public charter school that receives grant aid shall comply with all requirements to
receive such aid.
(13) A public charter school shall receive a proportionate per pupil share of any state
moneys not otherwise identified in this section that is received by the school district
of location. The public charter school shall also receive, according to federal law,
moneys generated under federal categorical aid programs for students that are
eligible for the aid and attending the public charter school. Each public charter
school that receives such aid shall comply with all requirements to receive such aid.
(14) The commissioner of education shall apply for all federal funding that supports
charter school initiatives for which a state must be the applicant and shall cooperate
with any public charter school in its efforts to seek federal funding.
(15) If a public charter school closes for any reason, the assets of the school shall be
distributed first to satisfy outstanding payroll obligations for employees of the
school, then to the creditors of the school, then to the district of location or
authorizing districts if authorized by a collaborative of local boards of education. If
the assets are insufficient to satisfy outstanding obligations, the authorizer shall
petition to Circuit Court of the county in which the public charter school is located
to prioritize the distribution of assets.
(16) The state board shall promulgate administrative regulations to:
(a) Establish the process to be used to evaluate the performance of a charter
school authorizer, based upon the requirements of KRS 160.1590 to 160.1599
and 161.141, and the actions to be taken in response to failures in
performance; and
(b) Govern the calculation and distribution of funds due to public charter schools
from school districts, the schedule of distribution of funds, and the imposition
of fines for late distribution of funds.
Page 15 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1281
(17) By August 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, each public charter school authorizer
shall submit to the commissioner of education, the secretary of the Education and
Labor Cabinet, and the Interim Joint Committee on Education a report to include:
(a) The names of each public charter school operating under contract with the
authorizer during the previous academic year that:
1. Closed during or after the academic year; or
2. Had the contract nonrenewed or revoked;
(b) The names of each public charter school operating under contract with the
authorizer during the previous academic year that have not yet begun to
operate;
(c) The number of applications received, the number reviewed, and the number
approved;
(d) A summary of the academic and financial performance of each public charter
school operated under contract with the authorizer during the previous
academic year; and
(e) The authorizing duties and functions performed by the authorizer during the
previous academic year.
Page 16 of 16
XXXX 2/12/2025 1:31 PM Jacketed